Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-828.02
Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team; created; administration; powers; emergency proclamation; assistance provided.

(1) The Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team is created and for administrative purposes is part of the office of the State Fire Marshal.

(2) The Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team may provide assistance or guidance to any individual who or entity that is attempting to prevent, control, suppress, or otherwise mitigate a wildland fire, as determined by the State Fire Marshal or his or her designee. Such assistance or guidance may be provided regardless of a state of emergency proclamation issued by the Governor relating to a wildland fire incident.

(3) Pursuant to the Emergency Management Act, the Adjutant General and the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency may provide assistance to the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team following a state of emergency proclamation issued by the Governor relating to a wildland fire incident.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 21.
July 19, 2024
Emergency Management Act, see section 81-829.36.